District of Columbia statutes.
47-1057

Crispus Attucks Development Corporation, lot 0046 in square 3117.

The real property located at 77 U Street, N.W., Washington, D.C., lot 0046 in square 3117, shall be exempt from all taxation so long as it is used to carry out the public purposes and activities of the Crispus Attucks Development Corporation and is not used for commercial purposes, subject to the provisions of §§ 47-1005, 47-1007, and 47-1009.

History

Apr. 22, 2004, D.C. Law 15-142, § 2, 51 DCR 2589

Temporary Legislation

For Temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of Crispus Attucks Development Corporation Real Property Tax Exemption and Equitable Real Property Tax Relief Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 14-303, May 3, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 3777).
For Temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2 of Crispus Attucks Development Corporation Real Property Tax Exemption and Equitable Real Property Tax Relief Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-121, March 30, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3808).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of § 47-1055, see § 2 of Crispus Attucks Development Corporation Real Property Tax Exemption and Equitable Real Property Tax Relief Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-597, January 7, 2003, 50 DCR 654).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Crispus Attucks Development Corporation Real Property Tax Exemption and Equitable Real Property Tax Relief Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-68, April 16, 2003, 50 DCR 3401).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(b) of Crispus Attucks Development Corporation Real Property Tax Exemption and Equitable Real Property Tax Relief Assistance Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-287, December 22, 2003, 51 DCR 3180).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(b) of Crispus Attucks Development Corporation Real Property Tax Exemption and Equitable Real Property Tax Relief Assistance Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-401, March 18, 2004, 51 DCR 3639).

Editor's Notes

Sections 4 and 5 of D.C. Law 15-142 provided: “Sec. 4. Applicability. Section 2 shall apply as of February 1, 2003.

Section 7041 of D.C. Law 17-219 repealed section 5 of D.C. Law 15-142.

D.C. Law 16-91 made a technical correction in the effective date clause of D.C. Law 15-142 that resulted in no change to the text.